District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Stability and Equity in Arts Grantmaking Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec 2. The Commission on the Arts and Humanities Act, effective October 21, 1975
(D.C. Law 1-22; D.C. Official Code § 39-201 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 39-203) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a-1) is amended to read as follows:
“(a-1)(1) The Commission shall consist of 12 members appointed by the Mayor, with the
advice and consent of the Council, in accordance with section 2(e)(32) of the Confirmation Act
of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-142; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01(e)(32)).
“(2) Each member appointed to the Commission shall be a District resident who
has displayed an interest or an ability in the arts or humanities or has been active in the
furtherance of the arts or humanities in the District of Columbia.
“(3) When appointing members to the Commission, the Mayor shall give due
consideration to recommendations made by representative civic, educational, and professional
groups concerned with the arts, humanities, and culture, and shall maintain reasonable


representation of all the various geographic areas and neighborhoods within the District of
Columbia.”.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) All members of the Commission shall be appointed to 3-year terms that shall
commence on July 1 in the year of appointment and expire on June 30 of the 3rd year.”.
(3) Subsection (b-1) is repealed.
(b) Section 6(c-1) (D.C. Official Code § 39-205(c-1)) is amended to read as follows:
“(c-1) The Commission shall allocate the annual budget as follows:
“(1) Not more than 20% of the annual budget shall be allocated for administrative
costs.
“(2) The funds remaining after the allocation described in paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall be allocated for grants for the following purposes:
“(A) 12.0% for grants to fund capital projects in support of eligible arts
and humanities organizations;
“(B) 50.0% for General Operating Support grants to eligible arts and
humanities organizations to be administered pursuant to section 6e;
“(C) 22.0% for other art grant programs established by the Commission;
and
“(D) 4.0% the for the Humanities Grant Program administered by
HumanitiesDC.
“(E) 12.0% for a large capital grant program to be administered pursuant
to section 6d.”
(c) Section 6c (D.C. Official Code § 39-205.03) is repealed.
(d) A new Section 6e is added to read as follows:


“Sec. 6e. General operating support grants program.
“(a) There is established within the Commission a General Operating Support Grants
program to provide subgrants to eligible organizations for offsetting the operating expenses of
eligible organizations.
“(b) For purposes of this section, the term “organization average expenses” shall mean
the organization’s expenses averaged from its two most recent Annual Form 990 filings
“(c) Eligibility for a general operating support grant shall be limited to organizations that:
“(1) Are incorporated as a nonprofit with a federally designated tax-exempt status
under section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Service (IRS) code and have a
principal business office address within in the District of Columbia, not including a Post Office
Box, as evidenced by the organization’s most recent Internal Revenue Service Annual Form 990
filing;
“(2) Have provided the organization’s two most recent Internal Revenue Service
Annual Form 990 filings with its grant application;
“(3) Have less than $100 million in organization average expenses;
“(4) Have a primary mission focusing on the arts or humanities disciplines such
that the majority the organization’s activities are related to the arts, arts education, or the
humanities;
“(5) Have an active Board of Directors; and
“(6) Have at least 51% of its activities or programs occur within the District of
Columbia.
“(d)(1) The base general operating funding amount for each eligible organization shall be
calculated as follows:


“(A) Determining the aggregate sum of all eligible organization average
expenses;
“(B) Dividing each individual organization’s average expenses by the sum
determined in subparagraph (A); and
“(C) Multiplying the amount calculated in subparagraph (B) by 2.
“(2) If the base general operating funding amount calculated under paragraph (1)
for an organization is more than one percent (1.0%) of the annual amount budgeted pursuant to
Section 6(c-1)(2)(B) of this act, the base funding amount for such organization shall be equal to
such one percent (1.0%) amount and such organization shall not be allocated additional funds
pursuant to subsection (e).
“(3) If the base general operating funding amount calculated under paragraph (1)
for an organization is less than three-quarters of one-tenth percent (0.075%) of the annual
amount budgeted pursuant to Section 6(c-1)(2)(B) of this act, the base general operating funding
amount for such organization shall be equal to such three-quarters of one-tenth percent (0.075%),
provided that for an organization where the base general operating funding amount calculated
pursuant to this paragraph exceeds 50% of the organization average expenses, such organization
shall be awarded a base general operating funding amount equal to 50% of the organization
average expenses and such organization shall not be allocated additional funds pursuant to
subsection (e) of this section.
“(e)(1) Funds budgeted pursuant to Section 6(c-1)(2)(B) of this act remaining after
allocating base funds pursuant to subsection (d) of this section shall be awarded as supplemental
100 general operating funding amounts.
101 “(2) Supplemental general operating funding amounts shall be competitive, and
102 each application of an eligible organization shall be reviewed in cohorts of similar budget size,


103 and with award amounts tiered in relation to the grantee’s budget size. In awarding supplemental
104 operating funding amounts, the Commission shall take into account:
105 “(A) The quality of the organization’s programming or services;
106 “(B) Charitable and philanthropic activities of the organization that make a
107 positive impact on the District, residents, or artists;
108 “(C) Diversity in governance, management, and administration of the
109 organization;
110 “(D) Economic impact on the District; and
111 “(E) Other factors as determined by the Commission.”.
112 (e) Section 7 (D.C. Official Code § 39-206) is repealed.
113 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
114 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
115 impact statement required by section 602(c)(3) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act,
116 approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(3)).
117 Sec. 4. Effective date.
118 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
119 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
120 as provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
121 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(2)).